Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1480
Failure to disclose; effect.

A person who fails to disclose as required by section 76-1479 shall be deemed an agent of the landlord for the purpose of:

(1) Service of process and receiving and receipting for notices and demands; and

(2) Performing the obligations of the landlord under the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act and rental agreement.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 31.